test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-4w-misko_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - misko :

      # Core

      # Nonposs
      misko+N+I+Sg: misko   #  a blood
      # misko+N+I+Pl: miskwa   #  bloods
      misko+N+I+Loc: miskohk   #  in a blood

      # Poss
      misko+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nimiskom   #  my blood
      misko+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: omiskom   #  his/her blood
      

      # Nonposs
      misko+N+I+Sg: misko   #  a blood
      # misko+N+I+Pl: miskwa   #  bloods
      misko+N+I+Loc: [miskohk, miskoh]   #  in a blood
      # misko+N+I+Loc+Dial/East: miskoh   #  in a blood


      # Der/Dim
      misko+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg: [miskos, miskosis]   #  a little blood
      

      # Poss # Sg
      misko+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nimiskom   #  my blood
      misko+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kimiskom   #  your blood
      misko+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: omiskom   #  his/her blood
      misko+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: nimiskominân   #  our blood
      misko+N+I+Px12Pl+Sg: kimiskominaw   #  your and our blood
      misko+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kimiskomiwâw   #  your blood
      misko+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg: omiskomiwâw   #  their blood
      misko+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: omiskomithiw   #  another's/others' blood
      

      # Poss # Pl
      # misko+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nimiskoma   #  my bloods
      # misko+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: kimiskoma   #  your bloods
      # misko+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: omiskoma   #  his/her bloods
      # misko+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nimiskominâna   #  our bloods
      # misko+N+I+Px12Pl+Pl: kimiskominawa   #  your and our bloods
      # misko+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: kimiskomiwâwa   #  your bloods
      # misko+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl: omiskomiwâwa   #  their bloods
      # misko+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: omiskomithiwa   #  another's/others' bloods
      

      # Poss # Loc
      misko+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: [nimiskomihk, nimiskomih]   #  in my blood
      misko+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc: [kimiskomihk, kimiskomih]   #  in your blood
      misko+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc: [omiskomihk, omiskomih]   #  in his/her blood
      misko+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc: [nimiskominâhk, nimiskominâh]   #  in our blood
      misko+N+I+Px12Pl+Loc: [kimiskominâhk, kimiskominâh]   #  in your and our blood
      misko+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc: [kimiskomiwâhk, kimiskomiwâh]   #  in your blood
      misko+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc: [omiskomiwâhk, omiskomiwâh]   #  in their blood
      misko+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: [omiskomithihk, omiskomithih]   #  in another's/others' blood
      
